New Jersey, session 221, A5212.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  The New Jersey Council of County Colleges shall collaborate with each county college in the State to 1[address] identify1 gaps in meeting basic student needs among low-income students.  The council shall, in consultation with the Department of Human Services, provide information to 1[students] designated representatives1 at county colleges on available social services supports and enrollment procedures.  The council may facilitate partnerships between county colleges and State agencies, county boards of social services, or community-based and other non-profit organizations to increase enrollment in social services supports among students in need 1[and establish direct provision of services on county college campuses where possible]1. 2.  Each county college shall work with a representative of the county board of social services to provide direct assistance to students and to help students to access social services supports.  Each county board of social services shall designate an employee of the agency to be responsible for collaborating with the countys community college representatives to ensure social services supports applications and related documents meet all requirements for consideration. The designee shall implement strategies to streamline the application process for social services supports for students enrolled in the county college. 3.  The Division of Family Development in the Department of Human Services shall work with 1[the New Jersey Council of County Colleges to assist] local workforce development boards and1 community college staff 1[so that staff are able]1 to better assist students with applications for the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP), Temporary Assistance to Needy Families (TANF), Childcare Subsidy, and other available social services supports. 4.  Each county college and local workforce development board shall establish a partnership to jointly engage with workforce training providers, economic development organizations, and community-based and other non-profit organizations to assist the entities in identifying populations of unemployed and underemployed residents who may benefit from enrollment in a county college 1if a partnership consistent with the provisions of this section does not currently exist1. The partnerships shall facilitate enrollment in county colleges to provide career pathways. 5.  This act shall take effect immediately.